src/morphology/affixes/declinations.lexc
! inflectional types and analogue rules for nouns, adjectives and other declinables
! VVS stands for Ü. Viks "Väike vormisõnastik" for reference purposes

!---------------
! inflectional types
!---------------

!---------------
! exceptional inflectional types, i.e. covering very few words each
!---------------

LEXICON ARGPÜKS   ! some compound words ending with püks (argpüks, vesipüks etc)
                  ! and declined not exactly like püksid (e.g. karupüksid, sukkpüksid) 
                  ! almost like TAUD, but has some less used pl forms
: TAUD ;
%+Use%/Rare:%{W%}%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;           ! argpükste etc


LEXICON KALLIS    !  VVS 7, 5 only kallis, kaunis unstable (closed) type; 

+Sg+Nom:s%{W%} GI ;                      ! kallis
+Sg+Par:s%{W%}%+t GI ;                   ! kallist
:%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;                     ! kallite etc 
%+Use%/Rare:s%{W%}%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! kalliste etc 
: 2C_STRONG ;                            ! kalli etc, kalleid, kalleil etc

LEXICON KAKS                  ! only üks, kaks

+Sg+Nom:ks GI ;                                ! kaks
:he N_SG_SUBPARA ;                             ! kahe etc 
+Sg+Par:h%+t GI ;                              ! kaht
+Sg+Par%+Use%/Rare:h%+te GI ;                  ! kahte
+Sg+Ill:he%+sse GI ;                           ! kahesse 
:hte%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;                         ! kahtede etc 
+Pl+Par:hte%+sid GI ;                          ! kahtesid

LEXICON KEVAD              ! only küps, kevad, = REDEL, but stem vowel is e

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;              ! kevad
:e 2C ;                              ! kevade etc

LEXICON KES       ! kes, mis 

+Sg+Nom:s #;
+Sg+Ade%+Use%/Rare:%+l #;                           ! kel, mil 
: KEMISETO ;
:lle%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;                         ! kellede etc 

LEXICON SEE       ! see 

+Sg+Nom:e GI ;
+Sg+Ill%+Use%/Rare:%+sse GI ;   ! sesse
+Sg+Ine%+Use%/Rare:%+s #;   ! ses
+Sg+Ela%+Use%/Rare:%+st GI ;  ! sest
+Sg+Ade%+Use%/Rare:%+l GI ;   ! sel
+Sg+Abl%+Use%/Rare:%+lt GI ;  ! selt	
+Sg+Tra%+Use%/Rare:%+ks GI ;  ! seks
: KEMISETO ;

LEXICON TOO       ! too 

+Sg+Nom:o GI ;
+Sg+Ill%+Use%/Rare:%+sse GI ;   ! tosse
+Sg+Ine%+Use%/Rare:%+s #;   ! tos
+Sg+Ela%+Use%/Rare:%+st GI ;  ! tost
+Sg+Ade%+Use%/Rare:%+l GI ;   ! tol
: KEMISETO ;

LEXICON KEMISETO      ! kes, mis, see, too common cont. lexicon

+Sg:lle STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;                      ! kelle, tolle etc , excl Pl Nom
+Sg+Par:%+da GI ;                               ! keda, toda etc

LEXICON NEED       ! need 

+Pl+Nom:e%+d GI ;           ! need
: NENO ;

LEXICON NEMAD       ! nemad 

+Pl+Nom+Emph:ema%+d GI ;           ! nemad
+Pl+Nom:a%+d GI ;           ! nad
:e NENO ;

LEXICON NOOD       ! nood 

+Pl+Nom:o%+d GI ;           ! nood
: NENO ;

LEXICON NENO       ! need & nood common cont. lexicon

:n%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;      ! nende etc 
+Pl+Par:%+id GI ;           ! neid
+Pl:i STANDARD_LOCATIVES ;     ! neil etc
+Pl+Trm:n%+de%+ni GI ;	  ! nendeni
+Pl+Ess:n%+de%+na GI ;	  ! nendena
+Pl+Abe:n%+de%+ta GI ;	  ! nendeta
+Pl+Com:n%+de%+ga GI ;    ! nendega
%+Use%/Rare:n%+de N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;      ! nendel etc 

LEXICON MASA       ! ma & sa 

+Sg+Nom+Emph:ina GI ;    ! mina, sina
+Sg+Nom:a #;                  ! ma, sa
+Sg+Gen+Emph:inu GI ;                  ! minu, sinu
+Sg+Gen:u #;                  ! mu, su
+Sg+Par:in%+d GI ;                               ! mind, sind
+Sg+Ill:u%+sse GI ;   ! musse
+Sg+Ine:u%+s #;     ! mus
+Sg+Ela:u%+st GI ;
+Sg+All:ul%+le GI ;	! mulle
+Sg+Ade:u%+l GI ;	
+Sg+Abl:u%+lt GI ;	
+Sg+Com:u%+ga #;     ! muga
+Sg+Emph:inu STANDARD_LOCATIVES ;                      ! minul, sinul
+Sg+Tra:inu%+ks GI ;
+Sg+Trm:inu%+ni GI ;	  ! minuni
+Sg+Ess:inu%+na GI ;	  ! minuna
+Sg+Abe:inu%+ta GI ;	  ! minuta
+Pl+Com+Emph:inu%+ga GI ;      ! minuga

LEXICON TEMA       ! ta 

+Sg+Nom+Emph:ema GI ;    ! tema
+Sg+Nom:a #;                  ! ta
+Sg+Gen+Emph:ema GI ;                  ! tema
+Sg+Gen:a #;                  ! ta
+Sg+Par:e%+da GI ;                               ! teda
+Sg+Emph:ema STANDARD_LOCATIVES ;                      ! temal etc
+Sg+Tra:ema%+ks GI ;
+Sg+Trm:ema%+ni GI ;	  ! temani
+Sg+Ess:ema%+na GI ;	  ! temana
+Sg+Abe:ema%+ta GI ;	  ! temata
+Pl+Com:ema%+ga GI ;      ! temaga
+Sg:a STANDARD_LOCATIVES ;                      ! tal etc

LEXICON KÕIK

+Sg+Nom: #;
+Sg:e%{W%} STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;                      ! kõige etc
+Sg+Par:e GI ;                              ! kõike
+Pl+Nom: #;                            ! kõik
+Pl%+Use%/Rare:i%+de STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;                      ! kõikide etc
+Pl:i%{W%} STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;                      ! kõigi etc

LEXICON METE       ! me & te 

+Pl+Nom+Emph:ie GI ;    ! meie, teie
+Pl+Nom: #;                  ! me, te
+Pl+Gen+Emph:ie GI ;    ! meie, teie
+Pl+Gen: #;                  ! me, te
+Pl+Par:i%+d GI ;                               ! meid, teid
+Pl:i STANDARD_LOCATIVES ;                      ! meil, teil etc
+Pl+Tra:ie%+ks GI ;
+Pl+Trm:ie%+ni GI ;	  ! meieni
+Pl+Ess:ie%+na GI ;	  ! meiena
+Pl+Abe:ie%+ta GI ;	  ! meieta
+Pl+Com:ie%+ga GI ;    ! meiega

LEXICON ISE       ! ise 

+Sg+Nom:ise GI ;                  ! ise
+Sg:enese REGULAR_GEN_ET_AL ;                      ! enese, enesel etc
+Sg:enda REGULAR_GEN_ET_AL ;                      ! enda, endal etc
+Sg+Par:ennas%+t GI ;                               
+Sg+Par:en%+d GI ;                               
+Sg+Ill:enese%+sse GI ;                            
+Sg+Ill:enda%+sse GI ;                           
+Pl:enes%+te REGULAR_GEN_ET_AL ;
+Pl:end%+i REGULAR_GEN_ET_AL ;

LEXICON OMAENESE       !  

+Sg+Gen%+Use%/Rare:enese GI ;                      ! enese, enesel etc
+Sg+Gen:enda GI ;                      ! enda, endal etc
+Pl+Gen:enes%+te GI ;
+Pl+Gen%+Use%/Rare:end%+i GI ;

LEXICON KEEGI    ! only keegi; (kes+gi); nonstandard parallel forms kellegil etc like REDEL

+Sg+Nom:e GI ;
: KEMISETO ;
%+Use%/NotNorm:llegi STANDARD_SEM_CASES ;  ! kellegis, 

LEXICON MISKI    ! only miski; mis+gi; nonstandard parallel forms millegil etc; miskid etc like REDEL

: KES ;
%+Use%/NotNorm:llegi STANDARD_SEM_CASES ;  ! millegis, millegil etc
%+Use%/NotNorm:skI5 2C ;                         ! miskid, miskite etc 


LEXICON KUMBKI    ! only kumbki; kumb like PIIM +gi; nonstandard parallel forms kummagil etc like REDEL

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;
:%{sg.a%} 1C ;
%+Use%/NotNorm:agI5%{W%} 2C ;  ! kummagis, kummagil etc
  
LEXICON KOHUS                 ! only kohus-kohtu; like HOOLAS

+Sg+Nom:s%{W%} GI ;                           ! kohus
: 2C_EXCL_SG_PAR ;                            ! kohtu etc  
+Sg+Par:%{W%}%+t GI ;                         ! kohut
+Sg+Par%+Use%/Rare:%+t GI ;                   ! kohtut

LEXICON KURAT    ! only kurat; like redel
   
+Sg+Nom:t GI ;                       ! kurat
:dI5 2C ;                            ! kuradi etc

LEXICON KÕRB   ! only kõrb

+Sg+Nom: GI ;                                  ! kõrb
:%+e N_SG_SUBPARA ;                            ! kõrbe etc 
+Sg+Par:e GI ;                                 ! kõrbe
+Sg+Par%+Use%/Rare:e%+t GI ;                   ! kõrbet
+Sg+Ill%+Use%/Rare:e GI ;                      ! kõrbe
+Sg+Ill:e%{W%}%+sse GI ;                       ! kõrbesse 
%+Use%/Rare:e%{W%}%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;          ! kõrbede etc 
:e%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;                          ! kõrbete etc 
+Pl+Par:e%+id GI ;                             ! kõrbeid 
+Pl+Par%+Use%/Rare:i GI ;                      ! kõrbi
+Pl+Par%+Use%/Rare:e%+sid GI ;                 ! kõrbesid

LEXICON KÖÖMEN               ! only köömen; like KEVAD

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;                        ! köömen
:e 2C ;                                        ! köömne etc  
+Sg+Par%+Use%/CommonNotNorm:%+t GI ;           ! kööment

LEXICON LAPS               ! only laps, uks; notice the weird (?) use of {W}

+Sg+Nom: GI ;                                 ! laps
:e N_SG_SUBPARA ;                             ! lapse etc 
+Sg+Par:%{W%}%+t GI ;                              ! last
+Sg+Ill:e%+sse GI ;                           ! lapsesse 
:%{W%}%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;                          ! laste etc 
+Pl+Par:%+i GI ;                              ! lapsi

LEXICON LÕUNA                 ! only lõuna; almost like haare

+Sg+Nom:%{W%} GI ;                      ! lõuna
+Sg+Par:%{W%}%+t GI ;                   ! lõunat
: 2C_EXCL_SG_PAR ;                      ! lõuna etc


LEXICON MANNER    ! VVS 3 only manner, tanner
                  ! almost = VAHER, but stem vowel is i

+Sg+Nom:%{W%} GI ;                     ! manner
:I5 2C ;                               ! mandri etc

LEXICON MEES                  ! only mees

+Sg+Nom:es GI ;                                ! mees
:he N_SG_SUBPARA ;                             ! mehe etc 
+Sg+Par:es%+t GI ;                             ! meest
+Sg+Ill:he%+sse GI ;                           ! mehesse 
:es%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;                         ! meeste etc 
+Pl+Par:h%+i GI ;                              ! mehi

LEXICON MÕNI    ! only mõni; similar to MERI

+Sg+Nom:i GI ;
:e N_SG_SUBPARA ;                        ! mõne etc
+Sg+Par%+Use%/Rare:%+d GI ;                         ! mõnd
+Sg+Par:+da GI ;                     ! actually, mõnda is the preferred form...
+Sg+Ill:+da GI ;                     ! actually, mõnda is the preferred form...
+Sg+Ill%+Use%/Rare:e%{W%} SG_ILL ;     ! mõnesse 
:%+e%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;                  ! mõnede etc
+Pl+Par:e%+sid GI ;                      ! mõnesid


LEXICON NAINE   ! only naine; much like OLULINE
                  
+Sg+Nom: GI ;
: NE_S ;
+Sg+Ill:E1%+sse GI ;             ! naisesse
+Pl+Par:%+I1 GI ;                           ! naisi
%+Use%/Rare:%+I1 N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! naisil etc

LEXICON NIIN    ! only niin; almost like KEEL, but some forms are more regular

+Sg+Nom: GI ;                                 ! niin
:e%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;                        ! niine etc 
+Sg+Par:%+t GI ;                              ! niint
+Sg+Ill:e%{W%}%+sse GI ;                      ! niinesse 
:%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;                          ! niinte etc 
! +N%+Use%/Hyp:%+i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! impossible for rarer words
+Pl+Par:e%+sid GI ;                           ! NB! niinesid (not niini)

LEXICON PARAS      ! only paras; like LOHAKAS

+Sg+Nom:s GI ;                         ! paras
:ja 2C ;                               ! paraja etc

LEXICON PEEN    ! only peen, tüün; almost like KEEL, but some forms are more regular

+Sg+Nom: GI ;                                  ! peen
:%+e N_SG_SUBPARA ;                            ! peene etc 
+Sg+Par:%+t GI ;                               ! peent
+Sg+Par%+Use%/NotNorm:e%+t GI ;                ! peenet
+Sg+Ill%+Use%/Rare:%+de GI ;                   ! peende
+Sg+Ill:e%{W%}%+sse GI ;                       ! peenesse 
:%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;                           ! peente etc 
%+Use%/NotNorm:e%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;            ! peenete etc 
+Pl+Par%+Use%/CommonNotNorm:e%+id GI ;         ! NB! peeneid 
+Pl+Par:i GI ;                                 ! peeni
%+Use%/Hyp:%{W%}%+i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! peenil etc

LEXICON PÄIKE  ! only päike(ne), äike(ne)  VVS 10

: XÄIKE ;
+Pl+Par:kese%+id GI ;                      ! päikeseid
+Pl+Par%+Use%/Rare:kse%+id GI ;            ! päikseid

LEXICON REHI   ! rehi, ruhi

: EIT ;
+Sg+Par%+Use%/Rare:%{W%}%+t #;   ! reht, ruht

LEXICON RIND   ! only rind, silm

: PIIM ;
+Pl+Gen%+Use%/Rare:%+e #;      ! rinde

LEXICON JALG   ! only jalg

: PIIM ;
%+Use%/Rare:%+e N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;      ! jalge

LEXICON RUBLA  ! about 20 words 

: PERE ;
+Sg+Par%+Use%/Rare: GI ;            ! (viis) rubla

LEXICON SADA    ! only sada

: KAVA ;
+Sg+Par%+Use%/Rare:%+t GI ;            ! sadat

LEXICON PURI  ! only puri

: EIT ;
+Pl+Par+Use%/Rare:e%+id GI ;  ! purjeid
